Illinois, session 104th, HB4117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 4-106 and 7-109.3 and by adding Sections 64-138.15 and 6-232 as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/4-106)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-106)8    Sec. 4-106. Firefighter, firefighters. "Firefighter, 9firefighters":10    (a) In municipalities which have adopted Division 1 of 11Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, any person employed 12in the municipality's fire service as a firefighter, fire 13engineer, marine engineer, fire pilot, bomb technician or 14scuba diver; and in any of these positions where such person's 15duties also include those of a firefighter as classified by 16the Civil Service Commission of that city, and whose duty is to 17participate in the work of controlling and extinguishing fires 18at the location of any such fires.19    (b) In municipalities which are subject to Division 2.1 of 20Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, any person employed 21by a city in its fire service as a firefighter, fire engineer, 22marine engineer, fire pilot, bomb technician, or scuba diver; 23and, in any of these positions whose duties also include those   HB4117- 2 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1of a firefighter and are certified in the same manner as a 2firefighter in that city.3    (c) Any person employed in a municipality's or fire 4protection district's fire service as a de facto firefighter.5    In this definition, "de facto firefighter" means a 6firefighter:7        (1) who spends a majority of the firefighter's working 8    time participating in the work of controlling and 9    extinguishing fires at the location of any such fires, 10    preparing for such work or waiting to respond to such 11    calls for work; and12        (2) whose scheduled or actual work hours are 13    commensurate in duration and frequency with firefighters 14    who are subject to Division 1 or Division 2.1 of Article 10 15    of the Illinois Municipal Code. 16    "De facto firefighter" does not include part-time 17firefighters who are not covered under this Section; 18auxiliary, reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including 19paid-on-call firefighters; and clerks, dispatchers, or other 20civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 21district who are not routinely expected to perform firefighter 22duties. In municipalities which are subject to neither 23Division 1 nor Division 2.1 of Article 10 of the Illinois 24Municipal Code, any person who would have been included as a 25firefighter under sub-paragraph (a) or (b) above except that 26he served as a de facto and not as a de jure firefighter.  HB4117- 3 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1    (d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section, 2"firefighter" does not include any person who is actively 3participating in the State Universities Retirement System 4under subsection (h) of Section 15-107 with respect to the 5employment for which he or she is a participating employee in 6that System.7    (e) This amendatory Act of 1977 does not affect persons 8covered by this Article prior to September 22, 1977.9    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 10the 104th General Assembly do not affect persons covered by 11this Article before the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly. 13(Source: P.A. 90-576, eff. 3-31-98.) 14    (40 ILCS 5/4-138.15 new)15    Sec. 4-138.15. Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act. The 16Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act, Article 20 of this Code, is 17adopted and made a part of this Article, but only with respect 18to a person who, on or after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, is entitled 20under this Article to begin receiving a retirement annuity or 21survivor's annuity (as those terms are defined in Article 20) 22and who elects to proceed under the Retirement Systems 23Reciprocal Act. 24    (40 ILCS 5/6-232 new)  HB4117- 4 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1    Sec. 6-232. Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act. The 2Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act, Article 20 of this Code, is 3adopted and made a part of this Article, but only with respect 4to a person who, on or after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, is entitled 6under this Article to begin receiving a retirement annuity or 7survivor's annuity (as those terms are defined in Article 20) 8and who elects to proceed under the Retirement Systems 9Reciprocal Act. 10    (40 ILCS 5/7-109.3)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-109.3)11    Sec. 7-109.3. "Sheriff's Law Enforcement Employees". 12    (a) "Sheriff's law enforcement employee" or "SLEP" means:13        (1) A county sheriff and all deputies, other than 14    special deputies, employed on a full time basis in the 15    office of the sheriff.16        (2) A person who has elected to participate in this 17    Fund under Section 3-109.1 of this Code, and who is 18    employed by a participating municipality to perform police 19    duties.20        (3) A law enforcement officer employed on a full time 21    basis by a Forest Preserve District, provided that such 22    officer shall be deemed a "sheriff's law enforcement 23    employee" for the purposes of this Article, and service in 24    that capacity shall be deemed to be service as a sheriff's 25    law enforcement employee, only if the board of   HB4117- 5 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1    commissioners of the District have so elected by adoption 2    of an affirmative resolution. Such election, once made, 3    may not be rescinded.4        (4) A person not eligible to participate in a fund 5    established under Article 3 of this Code who is employed 6    on a full-time basis by a participating municipality or 7    participating instrumentality to perform police duties at 8    an airport, but only if the governing authority of the 9    employer has approved sheriff's law enforcement employee 10    status for its airport police employees by adoption of an 11    affirmative resolution. Such approval, once given, may not 12    be rescinded.13        (5) A person first hired on or after January 1, 2011 14    who (i) is employed by a participating municipality that 15    has both 30 or more full-time police officers and 50 or 16    more full-time firefighters and has not established a fund 17    under Article 3 or Article 4 of this Code and (ii) is 18    employed on a full-time basis by that participating 19    municipality to perform police duties or firefighting and 20    EMS duties; but only if the governing authority of that 21    municipality has approved sheriff's law enforcement 22    employee status for its police officer or firefighter 23    employees by adoption of an affirmative resolution. The 24    resolution must specify that SLEP status shall be 25    applicable to such employment occurring on or after the 26    adoption of the resolution. Such resolution shall be   HB4117- 6 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1    irrevocable, but shall automatically terminate upon the 2    establishment of an Article 3 or 4 fund by the 3    municipality. 4        (6) A person who is not eligible to participate in a 5    fund established under Article 4 and is employed on a 6    full-time basis by a participating municipality to perform 7    duties as a paramedic, emergency medical technician (EMT), 8    emergency medical technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or 9    advanced emergency medical technician (A-EMT); but only if 10    the governing authority of that municipality has approved 11    sheriff's law enforcement employee status for such 12    employees by adoption of an affirmative resolution. The 13    resolution must specify that SLEP status shall be 14    applicable to such employment occurring on or after the 15    adoption of the resolution. Such resolution shall be 16    irrevocable. 17    (b) An employee who is a sheriff's law enforcement 18employee and is granted military leave or authorized leave of 19absence shall receive service credit in that capacity. 20Sheriff's law enforcement employees shall not be entitled to 21out-of-State service credit under Section 7-139.22(Source: P.A. 100-354, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1097, eff. 8-26-18.) 23    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 24Section 8.49 as follows:   HB4117- 7 -LRB104 15163 RPS 28307 b1    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)2    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 38 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 4the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 5Act of the 104th General Assembly. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.